RHVoiceCore/RHVoice/src/scripts/Belarusian/gpos.foma
# Copyright (C) 2025 Zvonimir Stanecic <zvonimirek222@yandex.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Preposition 
без | 
блізка | 
побач | 
ў | 
падчас | 
насуперак | 
ад | 
для | 
да | 
з | 
за | 
дзякуючы | 
замест | 
з | 
каля | 
праз | 
акрамя | 
паміж | 
на | 
вакол | 
над | 
нягледзячы на | 
а | 
аб | 
апроч | 
перад | 
па | 
побач | 
паза | 
помеж | 
панад | 
насуперак | 
сярод | 
пры | 
пра | 
насупраць | 
на працягу | 
пад | 
апасля | 
сяррод | 
цераз | 
адносна | 
з | 
да ; 


define Conjunction 
а | 
абы | 
або | 
але | 
чым | 
бо | 
затое | 
і | 
кем | 
каго | 
каму | 
якая | 
якое | 
які | 
якія | 
наўзамен | 
незважаючы | 
нібы | 
быццам | 
няхай | 
не | 
ніж | 
аднак | 
паколькі | 
прычым | 
алеж | 
колькі | 
колькам | 
колькіх | 
гэта | 
таму | 
хай | 
хоц | 
хаця | 
хто | 
ці | 
чый | 
чым | 
чыя | 
чые | 
чыі | 
чаму | 
чым | 
што | 
каб | 
абы | 
як | 
якая | 
якое | 
калі | 
які | 
ды ; 

define Particle 
вядома | 
у рэшце рэшт | 
аж | 
б | 
бы | 
ж | 
жа | 
толькі | 
амаль | 
навад | 
няўжо | 
не | 
вось | 
прыблізна | 
саме | 
так | 
таксама | 
хіба | 
проста ; 

define FunctionWord Conjunction | Preposition | Particle ; 

regex 
Conjunction -> conj || _ ,, 
Preposition -> prep || _ ,, 
Particle -> part || _ ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content || _ ; 
